District of Columbia statutes.
22-1810

Threatening to kidnap or injure a person or damage his property.

Whoever threatens within the District of Columbia to kidnap any person or to injure the person of another or physically damage the property of any person or of another person, in whole or in part, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 20 years, or both.

June 19, 1968, 82 Stat. 238, Pub. L. 90-351, title X, § 1502
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 223, 60 DCR 2064
Blackmail, see § 22-3252.
Extortion, see § 22-3251.
This section is referenced in § 23-546.
1981 Ed., § 22-2307.
1973 Ed., § 22-2307.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 223 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.